Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9 Workers' Compensation
11-9-519. Compensation for disability — Total disability.

In case of total disability, there shall be paid to the injured employee during the continuance of the total disability sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%) of his or her average weekly wage.

In the absence of clear and convincing proof to the contrary, the loss of both hands, both arms, both legs, both eyes, or of any two (2) thereof shall constitute permanent total disability.

In all other cases, permanent total disability shall be determined in accordance with the facts.

No more often than annually, the carrier or self-insured employer or the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund may require an injured worker receiving permanent total disability benefits to, as of the date thereof, certify on forms provided by the Workers' Compensation Commission that he or she is permanently and totally disabled and not gainfully employed.

Notice of the requirement shall be made by certified mail.

Failure of the employee to so certify within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice shall permit the discontinuance of benefits without penalty until otherwise ordered by the commission.

“Permanent total disability” means inability, because of compensable injury or occupational disease, to earn any meaningful wages in the same or other employment.

The burden of proof shall be on the employee to prove inability to earn any meaningful wage in the same or other employment.

In considering a claim for permanent disability, the commission and the courts shall not consider the odd-lot doctrine.

The commission, after a public hearing, shall adopt an impairment rating guide to be used in the assessment of anatomical impairment.

The guide shall not include pain as a basis for impairment.

The impairment rating guide adopted by the commission shall be subject to review by the General Assembly before April 1 of every odd-numbered year beginning with the regular session of 1999.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 13, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1957; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 8; 1981, No. 290, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1313; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 8; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 22; 1997, No. 251, § 1; 1997, No. 260, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 8. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

As enacted, present subsection (g) began:

“On or before July 1, 1994.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Partial Disability.

Partial disability decision by the Arkansas Workers'
Compensation Commission was affirmed for a worker with extremely limited job prospects due to limited education, poor English-speaking ability, and medical restrictions. The worker could not claim permanent and total disability as long as she could earn wages in even a very limited capacity.
Khampane v. Rheem Mfg. Co., 2011 Ark. App. 299 (2011).

11-9-520. Compensation for disability — Temporary partial disability.

In case of temporary partial disability resulting in the decrease of the injured employee's average weekly wage, there shall be paid to the employee sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the difference between the employee's average weekly wage prior to the accident and his or her wage-earning capacity after the injury.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 13, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1957; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1313; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 8.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 8. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

11-9-521. Compensation for disability — Scheduled permanent injuries.

An employee who sustains a permanent compensable injury scheduled in this section shall receive, in addition to compensation for temporary total and temporary partial benefits during the healing period or until the employee returns to work, whichever occurs first, weekly benefits in the amount of the permanent partial disability rate attributable to the injury, for that period of time set out in the following schedule:

Arm amputated at the elbow, or between the elbow and shoulder, two hundred forty-four (244) weeks;

Arm amputated between the elbow and wrist, one hundred eighty-three (183) weeks;

Leg amputated at the knee, or between the knee and the hip, one hundred eighty-four (184) weeks;

Leg amputated between the knee and the ankle, one hundred thirty-one (131) weeks;

Hand amputated, one hundred eighty-three (183) weeks;

Thumb amputated, seventy-three (73) weeks;

First finger amputated, forty-three (43) weeks;

Second finger amputated, thirty-seven (37) weeks;

Third finger amputated, twenty-four (24) weeks;

Fourth finger amputated, nineteen (19) weeks;

Foot amputated, one hundred thirty-one (131) weeks;

Great toe amputated, thirty-two (32) weeks;

Toe other than great toe amputated, eleven (11) weeks;

Eye enucleated, in which there was useful vision, one hundred five (105) weeks;

Loss of hearing of one ear, forty-two (42) weeks;

Loss of hearing of both ears, one hundred fifty-eight (158) weeks; and

Loss of one testicle, fifty-three (53) weeks; loss of both testicles, one hundred fifty-eight (158) weeks.

Compensation for amputation of the first phalange shall be one-half (½) of the compensation for the amputation of the entire digit.

Compensation for amputation of more than one (1) phalange of a digit shall be the same as for amputation of the entire digit.

Compensation for the permanent loss of eighty percent (80%) or more of the vision of an eye shall be the same as for the loss of an eye.

In all cases of permanent loss of vision, the use of corrective lenses may be taken into consideration in evaluating the extent of loss of vision.

Compensation for amputation or loss of use of two (2) or more digits or one (1) or more phalanges of two (2) or more digits of a hand or a foot may be proportioned to the total loss of use of the hand or the foot occasioned thereby but shall not exceed the compensation for total loss of a hand or a foot.

Compensation for permanent total loss of use of a member shall be the same as for amputation of the member.

Compensation for permanent partial loss or loss of use of a member shall be for the proportionate loss or loss of use of the member.

Any employee suffering a scheduled injury shall not be entitled to permanent partial disability benefits in excess of the percentage of permanent physical impairment set forth above except as otherwise provided in § 11-9-519(b).

The Workers' Compensation Commission, after a public hearing, shall adopt an impairment rating guide to be used in the assessment of anatomical impairment.

The guide shall not include pain as a basis for impairment.

The impairment rating guide adopted by the commission shall be subject to review by the General Assembly before April 1 of every odd-numbered year beginning with the regular session of 1999.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 13, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1957; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 8; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1313; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 8; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 23; 1997, No. 251, § 2; 1997, No. 260, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 8. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

As enacted, subdivision (h)(1)(A) began:

“On or before July 1, 1994.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided, in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-522. Compensation for disability — Unscheduled permanent partial disability.

A permanent partial disability not scheduled in § 11-9-521 shall be apportioned to the body as a whole, which shall have a value of four hundred fifty (450) weeks, and there shall be paid compensation to the injured employee for the proportionate loss of use of the body as a whole resulting from the injury.

In considering claims for permanent partial disability benefits in excess of the employee's percentage of permanent physical impairment, the Workers' Compensation Commission may take into account, in addition to the percentage of permanent physical impairment, such factors as the employee's age, education, work experience, and other matters reasonably expected to affect his or her future earning capacity.

However, so long as an employee, subsequent to his or her injury, has returned to work, has obtained other employment, or has a bona fide and reasonably obtainable offer to be employed at wages equal to or greater than his or her average weekly wage at the time of the accident, he or she shall not be entitled to permanent partial disability benefits in excess of the percentage of permanent physical impairment established by a preponderance of the medical testimony and evidence.

The employer or his or her workers' compensation insurance carrier shall have the burden of proving the employee's employment, or the employee's receipt of a bona fide offer to be employed, at wages equal to or greater than his or her average weekly wage at the time of the accident.

Included in the stated intent of this section is to enable an employer to reduce or diminish payments of benefits for a functional disability, disability in excess of permanent physical impairment, which, in fact, no longer exists, or exists because of discharge for misconduct in connection with the work, or because the employee left his or her work voluntarily and without good cause connected with the work.

In accordance with this section, the commission may reconsider the question of functional disability and change a previously awarded disability rating based on facts occurring since the original disability determination if any party makes application for reconsideration within one (1) year after the occurrence of the facts.

In considering a claim for permanent disability, the commission and the courts shall not consider the odd-lot doctrine.

Permanent total disability benefits shall be paid during the period of permanent total disability until the employee reaches the age of sixty-five (65); provided, with respect to permanent total disabilities resulting from injuries which occur after age sixty (60), regardless of the age of the employee, permanent total disability benefits are payable for a period of two hundred sixty (260) weeks.

The purpose and intent of this subsection is to prohibit workers' compensation from becoming a retirement supplement.

The commission, after a public hearing, shall adopt an impairment rating guide to be used in the assessment of anatomical impairment.

The guide shall not include pain as a basis for impairment.

The impairment rating guide adopted by the commission shall be subject to review by the General Assembly before April 1 of every odd-numbered year beginning with the regular session of 1999.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 13, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1957; Acts 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1313; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 24; 1997, No. 251, § 3; 1997, No. 260, § 3; 1999, No. 1168, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, subdivision (g)(1)(A) began: “On or before July 1, 1994.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided, in part: “Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-523. Compensation for disability — Hernia.

In all cases of claims for hernia, it shall be shown to the satisfaction of the Workers' Compensation Commission:

That the occurrence of the hernia immediately followed as the result of sudden effort, severe strain, or the application of force directly to the abdominal wall;

That there was severe pain in the hernial region;

That the pain caused the employee to cease work immediately;

That notice of the occurrence was given to the employer within forty-eight (48) hours thereafter; and

That the physical distress following the occurrence of the hernia was such as to require the attendance of a licensed physician within seventy-two (72) hours after the occurrence.

In every case of hernia, it shall be the duty of the employer forthwith to provide the necessary and proper medical, surgical, and hospital care and attention to effectuate a cure by radical operation of the hernia, to pay all reasonable expenses in connection therewith, and, in addition, to pay compensation not exceeding a period of twenty-six (26) weeks.

In case the employee shall refuse to permit the operation, it shall be the duty of the employer to provide all necessary first aid, medical and hospital care and service, to supply the proper and necessary truss or other mechanical appliance to enable the employee to resume work, to pay all reasonable expenses in connection therewith, and, in addition, to pay compensation not exceeding a period of thirteen (13) weeks.

In case death results within a period of one (1) year, either from the hernia or from the radical operation thereof, compensation shall be paid the dependents as provided in other death cases under this chapter.

Recurrence of the hernia following radical operation thereof shall be considered a separate hernia, and the provisions and limitations regarding the original hernia shall apply.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 13, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1957; Acts 1959, No. 144, § 1; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, §§ 2, 3, Acts 1969; Acts 1973, No. 221, § 2; 1975, No. 288, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1313.

11-9-524. Compensation for disability — Disfigurement.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall award compensation for serious and permanent facial or head disfigurement in a sum not to exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500).

No award for disfigurement shall be entered until twelve (12) months after the injury.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 13, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1957; Acts 1959, No. 144, § 1; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, §§ 2, 3, Acts 1969; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, §§ 8-10; 1979, No. 253, § 4; 1981, No. 290, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1313.

11-9-525. Compensation for disability — Second injuries.

The Second Injury Trust Fund established in this chapter is a special fund designed to ensure that an employer employing a worker with a disability will not, in the event that the worker suffers an injury on the job, be held liable for a greater disability or impairment than actually occurred while the worker was in his or her employment.

The employee is to be fully protected in that the fund pays the worker the difference between the employer's liability and the balance of his or her disability or impairment that results from all disabilities or impairments combined.

It is intended that latent conditions that are not known to the employee or employer not be considered previous disabilities or impairments which would give rise to a claim against the fund.

Commencing January 1, 1981, all cases of permanent disability or impairment in which there has been previous disability or impairment shall be compensated as provided in this section.

Compensation shall be computed on the basis of the average earnings at the time of the last injury.

If any employee who has a permanent partial disability or impairment, whether from compensable injury or otherwise, receives a subsequent compensable injury resulting in additional permanent partial disability or impairment so that the degree or percentage of disability or impairment caused by the combined disabilities or impairments is greater than that which would have resulted from the last injury, considered alone and of itself, and if the employee is entitled to receive compensation on the basis of combined disabilities or impairments, then the employer at the time of the last injury shall be liable only for the degree or percentage of disability or impairment that would have resulted from the last injury had there been no preexisting disability or impairment.

After the compensation liability of the employer for the last injury, considered alone, which shall be no greater than the actual anatomical impairment resulting from the last injury, has been determined by an administrative law judge or the Workers' Compensation Commission, the degree or percentage of employee's disability that is attributable to all injuries or conditions existing at the time the last injury was sustained shall then be determined by the administrative law judge or the commission, and the degree or percentage of disability or impairment that existed prior to the last injury plus the disability or impairment resulting from the combined disability shall be determined, and compensation for that balance, if any, shall be paid out of the fund provided for in § 11-9-301.

If the previous disability or impairment, whether from compensable injury or otherwise, and the last injury together result in permanent total disability, the employer at the time of the last injury shall be liable only for the actual anatomical impairment resulting from the last injury considered alone and of itself. However, if the compensation for which the employer at the time of the last injury is liable is less than the compensation provided in §§ 11-9-501 — 11-9-506 for permanent total disability, then, in addition to the compensation for which the employer is liable and after the completion of payment of compensation by the employer, the employee shall be paid the remainder of the compensation that would be due for permanent total disability under §§ 11-9-501 — 11-9-506 out of the fund.

The Treasurer of State shall be the custodian of the fund, and any interest accruing shall be added thereto.

The commission shall direct the distribution of the funds from the fund.

In all cases in which a recovery against the fund is sought for permanent partial disability or for permanent total disability, the Treasurer of State as custodian shall be named as a party and shall be entitled to defend against the claim.

The Treasurer of State, with the advice and consent of the Attorney General, may enter into settlements as contemplated by §§ 11-9-804 and 11-9-805.

All awards for permanent partial disability or for permanent total disability affecting the fund shall be subject to the provisions of the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq., governing review and appeal.

If more than one (1) injury in the same employment causes concurrent temporary disabilities, weekly benefits shall be payable only for the longest and largest paying disability.

If more than one (1) injury in the same employment causes concurrent and consecutive permanent partial disability, weekly benefits for each subsequent disability shall not begin until the end of the compensation period for the prior disability.

No claims under this section shall be made on or after January 1, 2008.

For all claims for permanent partial disability or permanent total disability made on or after January 1, 2008, the employer at the time of the employee's compensable injury is liable for such benefits subject to this chapter, excluding subsections (a)-(d) of this section.

A claimant who has been deemed permanently totally disabled and is currently receiving benefits from the Second Injury Trust Fund as of December 31, 2009, shall receive those benefits from the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund commencing January 1, 2010.

For all claims pending against the Second Injury Trust Fund on and after January 1, 2010, if a claimant becomes eligible to receive benefits for permanent total disability from the Second Injury Trust Fund, then upon completion of payment by the employer of its obligation under subdivision (b)(5) of this section, the claimant shall be paid the remainder of the compensation that would be due for permanent total disability from the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 13, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1957; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, §§ 2, 3, Acts 1969; Acts 1973, No. 221, § 2; 1979, No. 253, § 4; 1981, No. 290, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1313; Acts 2007, No. 1415, § 1; 2009, No. 327, §§ 2, 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-124, the term “handicapped worker” has been replaced with “worker with a disability.”

11-9-526. Compensation for disability — Refusal of employee to accept employment.

If any injured employee refuses employment suitable to his or her capacity offered to or procured for him or her, he or she shall not be entitled to any compensation during the continuance of the refusal, unless in the opinion of the Workers' Compensation Commission, the refusal is justifiable.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 13, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1956, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1957; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1313.

11-9-527. Compensation for death.

Funeral Expenses. If death results from an injury occurring on or after July 1, 1993, the employer shall pay the actual funeral expenses, not exceeding the sum of six thousand dollars ($6,000).

Time of Death. If death does not result within one (1) year from the date of the accident or within the first three (3) years of the period for compensation payments fixed by the compensation order, a rebuttable presumption shall arise that the death did not result from the injury.

Beneficiaries — Amounts. Subject to the limitations as set out in §§ 11-9-501 — 11-9-506, compensation for the death of an employee shall be paid to those persons who were wholly and actually dependent upon the deceased employee in the following percentage of the average weekly wage of the employee and in the following order of preference:

To the widow if there is no child, thirty-five percent (35%), and the compensation shall be paid until her death or remarriage.

However, the widow shall establish, in fact, some dependency upon the deceased employee before she will be entitled to benefits as provided in this section;

To the widower if there is no child, thirty-five percent (35%), and the compensation shall be paid until his death or remarriage.

However, the widower shall establish, in fact, some dependency upon the deceased employee before he will be entitled to benefits as provided in this section;

To the widow or widower if there is a child, the compensation payable under subdivision (c)(1) of this section and fifteen percent (15%) on account of each child;

To one (1) child if there is no widow or widower, fifty percent (50%).

If more than one (1) child, and there is no widow or widower, fifteen percent (15%) for each child, and in addition thereto, thirty-five percent (35%) to the children as a class, to be divided equally among them;

To the parents, twenty-five percent (25%) each;

To brothers, sisters, grandchildren, and grandparents, fifteen percent (15%) each.

Terminations of Dependence.

In the event the widow remarries before full and complete payment to her of the benefits provided in subsection (c) of this section, there shall be paid to her a lump sum equal to compensation for one hundred four (104) weeks, subject to the limitation set out in §§ 11-9-501 — 11-9-506.

A physically or mentally incapacitated child, grandchild, brother, or sister shall be entitled to compensation as a dependent of the deceased employee without regard to age or marital status, but if physically or mentally capacitated to earn a livelihood, dependency shall terminate with the attainment of eighteen (18) years of age or upon marriage. However, benefits to an otherwise eligible child shall not terminate at the age of eighteen (18) years provided the child is a full-time student who has not attained the age of twenty-five (25) years.

Apportionment of Benefits. Where, because of the limitation in subsection (c) of this section, a person or class of persons cannot receive the percentage of compensation specified as payable to or on account of the person or class, there shall be available to the person or class that proportion of the percentage which, when added to the total percentage payable to all persons having priority or preference, will not exceed a total of sixty-five percent (65%), which proportion shall be paid:

To that person; or

To that class in equal shares unless the Workers' Compensation Commission determines otherwise in accordance with the provisions of subsection (f) of this section.

Determination of Beneficiaries Within Class. If the commission determines that payments in accordance with subdivision (e)(2) of this section would provide no substantial benefit to any person of the class, it may provide for the payment of the compensation to the persons within the class whom it considers will be most benefited by the payment.

Cessation of Compensation to Part. Upon the cessation of compensation under this section to or on account of any person, the compensation of the remaining persons entitled to compensation for the unexpired part of the period during which their compensation is payable shall be that which the persons would have received if they had been the only persons entitled to compensation at the time of the decedent's death.

Determination of Dependency. All questions of dependency shall be determined as of the time of the injury.

Partial Dependency.

If the employee leaves dependents who are only partially dependent upon his or her earnings for support at the time of injury, the compensation payable for partial dependency shall be in the proportion that the partial dependency bears to total dependency.

In any claim for partial dependency where the average weekly contributions for support were not such as to entitle all dependents to compensation in the aggregate sum of seven dollars ($7.00) per week, the dependents shall receive compensation for a period not to exceed four hundred fifty (450) weeks in an amount not to exceed the amount of average weekly contributions of the deceased employee for the support of the dependents.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 15, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1961, No. 479, § 1; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 4, Acts 1969; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, §§ 12, 13; 1981, No. 290, § 5; 1985, No. 842, § 1; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1315; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, §§ 12, 13; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 25.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, §§ 12, 13. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided, in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-528. Employer records.

Every employer shall keep a record with respect to any injury to an employee.

The record shall contain such information of disability or death with respect to the injury as the Workers' Compensation Commission may by rule require.

The record shall be available for inspection by the commission or by any state authority at such time and under such conditions as the commission may by rule prescribe.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 33, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1333; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 795.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (b) and (c).

11-9-529. Employer reports.

Within ten (10) days after the date of receipt of notice or of knowledge of injury or death, the employer shall send to the Workers' Compensation Commission a report setting forth:

The name, address, and business of the employer;

The name, address, and occupation of the employee;

The cause and nature of the injury or death;

The year, month, day, and hour when, and the particular locality where, the injury or death occurred; and

Such other information as the commission may require.

Additional reports with respect to the injury and of the condition of the employee shall be sent by the employer to the commission at such time and in such manner as the commission may prescribe.

Any report provided for in subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall not be evidence of any fact stated in the report in any proceeding with respect to the injury or death on account of which the report is made.

The mailing of any report in a stamped envelope, properly addressed, within the time prescribed in subsection (a) or (b) of this section, shall be in compliance with this section.

Any employer who after notice refuses to send any report required of it by this section shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each refusal.

Whenever the employer has failed or refused to comply as provided in this section, the commission may serve upon the employer a proposed order declaring the employer to be in violation of this chapter and containing the amount, if any, of the civil penalty to be assessed against the employer pursuant to this section.

An employer may contest a proposed order of the commission issued pursuant to subsection (e) of this section by filing with the commission, within twenty (20) days of receipt of the proposed order, a written request for a hearing.

If a written request for hearing is not filed with the commission within this time, the proposed order, proposed penalty, or both, shall be a final order of the commission.

Such a request for a hearing need not be in any particular form but shall specify the grounds upon which the person contests the proposed order, the proposed assessment, or both.

A proposed order by the commission pursuant to this section is prima facie correct, and the burden is upon the employer to prove that the proposed order is incorrect.

Hearings conducted under this section shall proceed as provided in §§ 11-9-704 — 11-9-711.

If an employer fails to pay any civil penalty assessed against the employer after an order issued pursuant to this section has become final by operation of law, the commission may petition the circuit court of the county wherein is located the employer's principal place of business for an order enjoining the employer from engaging in further employment or conduct of business or until such time as the employer makes all required reports and pays all civil penalties.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 34, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1334; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 26.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided, in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-530. Managed care implementation.

Implementation of Workers' Compensation Commission Rule 33 regarding managed care shall be voluntary for all employers.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 975, § 11; 1999, No. 1179, § 12.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-4, 6-10, and §§ 11-9-501 to 11-9-529 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 6
— Occupational Disease

Effective Dates.

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 21: Feb. 13, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the welfare of both employer and employee is of primary interest and concern to the State of Arkansas; that the maximum benefits presently payable under the Workmen's Compensation laws are inadequate due to the steadily increasing cost of living and should be increased immediately to meet said increase in the cost of living; that certain other provisions should be clarified or modified, and that it is in the best interest of both employers and employees that this be accomplished as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 21: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1227 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby delared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Publisher's Notes.

Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, referred to in Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 21, is cited as 290 Ark. 100, 717 S.W.2d 488 (1986).

11-9-601. Compensation generally.

Where an employee suffers from an occupational disease as defined in this subchapter and is disabled or dies as a result of the disease and where the disease was due to the nature of the occupation or process in which he or she was employed within the period previous to his or her disablement as limited in subsection (g) of this section, then the employee, or, in case of death, his or her dependents, shall be entitled to compensation as if the disablement or death were caused by injury, except as otherwise provided in this subchapter.

No compensation shall be payable for an occupational disease if the employee, at the time of entering into the employment of the employer by whom the compensation would otherwise be payable, falsely represented himself or herself in writing as not having previously been disabled, laid off, or compensated in damages or otherwise, because of the disease.

Where an occupational disease is aggravated by any other disease or infirmity, not itself compensable, or where disability or death from any other cause, not itself compensable, is aggravated, prolonged, accelerated, or in any way contributed to by an occupational disease, the compensation payable shall be reduced and limited to the proportion only of the compensation that would be payable if the occupational disease were the sole cause of the disability or death as the occupational disease, as a causative factor, bears to all the causes of the disability or death.

The reduction in compensation is to be effected by reducing the number of weekly or monthly payments or the amounts of the payments, as under the circumstances of the particular case may be for the best interest of the claimant.

No compensation for death from an occupational disease shall be payable to any person whose relationship to the deceased which, under the provisions of this chapter, would give right to compensation arose subsequent to the beginning of the first compensable disability except to afterborn children of a marriage existing at the beginning of the disability.

“Occupational disease”, as used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, means any disease that results in disability or death and arises out of and in the course of the occupation or employment of the employee or naturally follows or unavoidably results from an injury as that term is defined in this chapter.

However, a causal connection between the occupation or employment and the occupational disease must be established by a preponderance of the evidence.

No compensation shall be payable for any contagious or infectious disease unless contracted in the course of employment in or immediate connection with a hospital or sanitorium in which persons suffering from that disease are cared for or treated.

No compensation shall be payable for any ordinary disease of life to which the general public is exposed.

Where compensation is payable for an occupational disease, the employer in whose employment the employee was last injuriously exposed to the hazards of the disease and the carrier, if any, on the risk when the employee was last injuriously exposed under the employer shall be liable.

The amount of the compensation shall be based upon the average weekly wage of the employee when last injuriously exposed under the employer, and the notice of injury and claim for compensation, as required pursuant to this subchapter, shall be given and made to the employer.

An employer shall not be liable for any compensation for an occupational disease unless:

The disease is due to the nature of an employment in which the hazards of the disease actually exist and are characteristic thereof and peculiar to the trade, occupation, process, or employment and is actually incurred in his or her employment. This includes any disease due to or attributable to exposure to or contact with any radioactive material by an employee in the course of his or her employment;

Disablement or death results within three (3) years in case of silicosis or asbestosis, or one (1) year in case of any other occupational disease, except a diseased condition caused by exposure to X rays, radioactive substances, or ionizing radiation, after the last injurious exposure to the disease in the employment; or

In case of death, death follows continuous disability from the disease, commencing within the period above limited, for which compensation has been paid or awarded or timely claim made as provided in this subchapter and results within seven (7) years after the last exposure.

However, in case of a diseased condition caused by exposure to X rays, radioactive substances, or ionizing radiation only, the limitations expressed do not apply.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 14, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1963, No. 539, §§ 1, 2; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1314; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 11; Acts 2001, No. 1281, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 11. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.